Utah statutes.
53A-1a-103.   Public education's mission.

The Legislature recognizes that public education's mission is to assure Utah the best educated citizenry in the world and each individual the training to succeed in a global society, by providing students with learning and occupational skills, character development, literacy, and basic knowledge through a responsive educational system that guarantees local school communities autonomy, flexibility, and client choice, while holding them accountable for results.

